en: Motor Vehicle Engine Oil Circulation
xx: Motor Vehicle Engine Oil Circulation
cs: Olejové systémy vozidel
da: Oliecirkulation til motorkøretøjer
de: Teile für Kfz-Ölkreislauf
es: Circulación de aceite de motor para vehículos motorizados
fr: Circulation d'huile pour moteurs de véhicules
it: Circolazione olio per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用エンジンオイル循環装置
nl: Motoroliecirculatie voor motorvoertuigen
no: Oljesirkulasjon for motorkjøretøy
pl: Układy smarowania
pt: Circulação de óleo do motor de veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные системы циркуляции масла
sv: Oljecirkulation för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Araç Motor Yağı Devirdaimi

en: Motor Vehicle Engine Parts
xx: Motor Vehicle Engine Parts
cs: Díly motorů vozidel
da: Motordele til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Motorteile
es: Piezas del motor de vehículos motorizados
fr: Pièces moteur
it: Componenti motore per veicoli
ja: 自動車・バイク用エンジンパーツ
nl: Motoronderdelen voor motorvoertuigen
no: Motordeler til motorkjøretøy
pl: Części silnikowe
pt: Peças de motor para veículos motorizados
ru: Детали автомобильных двигателей
sv: Motordelar till motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Motor Parçaları

en: Motor Vehicle Engines
xx: Motor Vehicle Engines
cs: Motory vozidel
da: Motorer til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Motoren
es: Motores para vehículos motorizados
fr: Moteurs de véhicules
it: Motori per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用エンジン
nl: Motors voor motorvoertuigen
no: Motorer til kjøretøy
pl: Silniki
pt: Motores para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные двигатели
sv: Fordonsmotorer
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Motorları

en: Motor Vehicle Exhaust
xx: Motor Vehicle Exhaust
cs: Výfuky
da: Udstødningsrør til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Auspuff
es: Tubos de escape para vehículos motorizados
fr: Échappement
it: Scarichi per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用排気系パーツ
nl: Uitlaat voor motorvoertuigen
no: Eksosanlegg til motorkjøretøy
pl: Elementy układu wydechowego
pt: Motor de escape do veículo
ru: Автомобильные выхлопные системы
sv: Avgassystem för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Egsozu

en: Motor Vehicle Frame & Body Parts
xx: Motor Vehicle Frame & Body Parts
cs: Součásti rámu a karoserie vozidel
da: Ramme og karosseridele til motorkøretøjer
de: Rahmen- & Karosserieteile
es: Piezas de bastidor y carrocería para vehículos motorizados
fr: Pièces de châssis et carrosserie
it: Telaio e parti della carrozzeria di veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用フレーム・ボディパーツ
nl: Chassis- en carrosserieonderdelen voor motorvoertuigen
no: Ramme- og karosserideler til motorkjøretøy
pl: Karoserie i ramy do pojazdów silnikowych
pt: Peças de chassi e carroceria para veículos motorizados
ru: Детали автомобильных рам и корпусов
sv: Ramar och karossdelar för fordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Şasi ve Gövde Parçaları

en: Motor Vehicle Fuel Systems
xx: Motor Vehicle Fuel Systems
cs: Palivové systémy motorových vozidel
da: Brændstofsystemer til motorkøretøjer
de: Kraftstoffanlagen
es: Sistemas de combustible para vehículos motorizados
fr: Systèmes d'alimentation en carburant
it: Sistemi di alimentazione per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用燃料系パーツ
nl: Brandstofsystemen voor motorvoertuigen
no: Drivstoffsystemer for kjøretøy
pl: Układy paliwowe
pt: Sistemas de combustível para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные топливные системы
sv: Bränslesystem för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Yakıt Sistemleri

en: Motor Vehicle Interior Fittings
xx: Motor Vehicle Interior Fittings
cs: Vybavení interiéru vozidel
da: Interiør til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Innenausstattung
es: Accesorios de montaje para el interior de vehículos motorizados
fr: Équipements intérieurs de véhicules
it: Accessori interni per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車用インテリア付属品
nl: Interieuren voor motorvoertuigen
no: Interiørdeler til motorkjøretøy
pl: Wyposażenie wnętrza
pt: Acessórios interiores para veículos motorizados
ru: Фурнитура для салонов автомобилей
sv: Fordonsinredningar
tr: Motorlu Taşıt İç Donanımları

en: Motor Vehicle Lighting
xx: Motor Vehicle Lighting
cs: Osvětlení motorových vozidel
da: Lygter til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Beleuchtung
es: Luces para vehículos motorizados
fr: Éclairage de véhicule
it: Illuminazione per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用ライト
nl: Verlichting voor motorvoertuigen
no: Belysning for motorkjøretøy
pl: Oświetlenie samochodowe
pt: Luzes veiculares
ru: Автомобильная светотехника
sv: Lampor till motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Lambaları

en: Motor Vehicle Mirrors
xx: Motor Vehicle Mirrors
cs: Zrcátka k motorovým vozidlům
da: Spejle til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Spiegel
es: Espejos para vehículos motorizados
fr: Rétroviseurs
it: Specchietti per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用ミラー
nl: Spiegels voor motorvoertuigen
no: Speil til motorkjøretøy
pl: Lusterka samochodowe
pt: Espelhos para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные зеркала
sv: Speglar för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Aynaları

en: Motor Vehicle Power & Electrical Systems
xx: Motor Vehicle Power & Electrical Systems
cs: Napájecí a elektrické systémy vozidel
da: Strømsystemer og elektriske systemer til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Elektroniksysteme
es: Sistemas eléctricos y de alimentación para vehículos motorizados
fr: Systèmes d'alimentation pour véhicules, Allume-cigare
it: Sistemi elettrici e di alimentazione per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用電気系統装置
nl: Elektrische systemen voor motorvoertuigen
no: Strømsystemer og elektriske systemer til motorkjøretøy
pl: Układy elektryczne i zapłonowe
pt: Sistemas de alimentação e eletricidade para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные силовые и электрические системы
sv: Strömförsörjning och elsystem för fordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Güç ve Elektrik Sistemleri

en: Motor Vehicle Seating
xx: Motor Vehicle Seating
cs: Sedadla vozidel
da: Sæder til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Sitze
es: Asientos para vehículos motorizados
fr: Sièges de véhicules
it: Sedili per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用シート
nl: Stoelen voor motorvoertuigen
no: Seter til motorkjøretøy
pl: Fotele i siedzenia
pt: Assento de veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные кресла и сиденья
sv: Säten för fordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Koltukları

en: Motor Vehicle Sensors & Gauges
xx: Motor Vehicle Sensors & Gauges
cs: Senzory a ukazatele pro vozidla
da: Sensorer og målere til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Sensoren & -Messinstrumente
es: Sensores y medidores para vehículos motorizados
fr: Capteurs et jauges, Assistant de conduite, Radar de stationnement
it: Sensori e indicatori per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用センサー・ゲージ
nl: Sensoren en meters voor motorvoertuigen
no: Sensorer og målere til motorkjøretøy
pl: Wskaźniki i czujniki
pt: Sensores e indicadores para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные датчики и приборы
sv: Sensorer och mätare för motorer
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Sensörleri ve Göstergeleri

en: Motor Vehicle Suspension Parts
xx: Motor Vehicle Suspension Parts
cs: Součásti odpružení vozidel
da: Affjedringsdele til motorkøretøjer
de: Aufhängungsteile für Autos
es: Piezas de la suspensión de vehículos motorizados
fr: Pièces de suspension pour véhicules
it: Parti di sospensioni per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用サスペンションパーツ
nl: Ophangingsonderdelen voor motorvoertuigen
no: Hjulopphengsdeler til motorkjøretøy
pl: Części zawieszenia
pt: Peças de suspensão para veículos motorizados
ru: Детали автомобильной подвески
sv: Delar till hjulupphängning
tr: Motorlu Araç Süspansiyon Parçaları

en: Motor Vehicle Towing
xx: Motor Vehicle Towing
cs: Tažná zařízení
da: Bugseringsudstyr til motorkøretøjer
de: Abschleppzubehör
es: Remolque de vehículos motorizados
fr: Remorquage de véhicules motorisés
it: Traino per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用牽引用品
nl: Motorvoertuigen slepen
no: Tauing av motorkjøretøy
pl: Sprzęt holowniczy
pt: Reboque de veículos motorizados
ru: Средства для буксировки автомобилей
sv: Bogsering av fordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Çekme

en: Motor Vehicle Transmission & Drivetrain Parts
xx: Motor Vehicle Transmission & Drivetrain Parts
cs: Součásti převodovek a hnacího ústrojí vozidel
da: Transmissionsdele til motorkøretøjer
de: Getriebe- & Antriebsteile
es: Piezas de la transmisión y transmisión secundaria de vehículos motorizados
fr: Pièces de transmission pour véhicules
it: Parti di trasmissione per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用トランスミッションパーツ
nl: Versnellingsbak- en aandrijflijnonderdelen voor motorvoertuigen
no: Transmisjons- og drivverkdeler til motorkjøretøy
pl: Części układu przeniesienia napędu
pt: Peças do sistema de direção e transmissão para veículos motorizados
ru: Детали автомобильной трансмиссии
sv: Delar till växellådor och drivlinor
tr: Motorlu Araç Şanzımanı ve Aktarma Organı Parçaları

en: Motor Vehicle Wheel Systems
xx: Motor Vehicle Wheel Systems
cs: Kola motorových vozidel
da: Hjulsystemer til motorkøretøjer
de: Kfz-Räder
es: Sistemas de ruedas para vehículos motorizados
fr: Systèmes pour roues
it: Impianti ruote per veicoli a motore
ja: 自動車・バイク用ホイールシステム
nl: Wielsystemen voor motorvoertuigen
no: Hjulsystemer til motorkjøretøy
pl: Koła do pojazdów silnikowych
pt: Sistemas de rodagem para veículos motorizados
ru: Автомобильные колёсные системы
sv: Hjulsystem för motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Tekerlekleri

en: Motor Vehicle Rims & Wheels
xx: Motor Vehicle Rims & Wheels
cs: Ráfky a kola na motorová vozidla
da: Fælge og hjul til motorkøretøjer
de: Felgen & Reifen für Kfz
es: Ruedas y llantas de automóviles
fr: Jantes et roues
it: Cerchi e ruote automotive
ja: 自動車・バイク用リム・ホイール
nl: Velgen en wielen
no: Felger og hjul til motorkjøretøy
pl: Koła i felgi
pt: Calotas e rodas
ru: Автомобильные колёса и диски
sv: Fälgar och hjul till motorfordon
tr: Motorlu Taşıt Jant ve Tekerlekleri

en: Automotive Rims & Wheels
xx: Automotive Rims & Wheels
cs: Automobilové ráfky a disky
da: Fælge og hjul til biler
de: Autofelgen & -räder
es: Llantas y ruedas para automoción
fr: Jantes et roues d'automobiles
it: Cerchi e ruote per auto
ja: 乗用車用リム・ホイール
nl: Autovelgen en -wielen
no: Felger og hjul til biler
pl: Koła i felgi samochodowe
pt: Aros e rodas automotivas
ru: Диски и колёса для автомобилей
sv: Fälgar och hjul till bilar
tr: Araba Jant ve Tekerlekleri

en: Motorcycle Rims & Wheels
xx: Motorcycle Rims & Wheels
cs: Motocyklové ráfky a disky
da: Fælge og hjul til motorcykler
de: Motorradfelgen & -räder
es: Llantas y ruedas de motocicletas
fr: Jantes et roues de motos
it: Cerchi e ruote per moto
ja: バイク用リム・ホイール
nl: Motorvelgen en -wielen
no: Felger og hjul til motorsykler
pl: Koła i felgi motocyklowe
pt: Aros e rodas de motocicleta
ru: Диски и колёса для мотоциклов
sv: Fälgar och hjul till motorcyklar
tr: Motosiklet Jant ve Tekerlekleri

en: Off-Road and All-Terrain Vehicle Rims & Wheels
xx: Off-Road and All-Terrain Vehicle Rims & Wheels
cs: Ráfky a kola terénních vozidel
da: Fælge og hjul til ATV og UTV
de: Felgen & Räder für ATV & UTV
es: Ruedas y llantas para vehículos TT y UTV
fr: Jantes et roues de véhicules tout-terrain et quads
it: Veicoli ATV e fuoristrada
ja: ATV・UTV 用リム・ホイール
nl: ATV- en UTV-velgen en -wielen
no: Felger og hjul til terrengkjøretøy og firhjulinger
pl: Felgi i koła do pojazdów terenowych
pt: Rodas e aros para veículos off-road
ru: Диски и колеса для мотовездеходов ATV и UTV
sv: ATV- och UTV-fälgar och -hjul
tr: Yol Dışı ve Arazi Tipi Araç Jantları ve Tekerlekleri